Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4517.02
Policy or certificate; nonforfeiture benefits.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a long-term care insurance policy may not be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless the policyholder or certificate holder has been offered the option of purchasing a policy or certificate including a nonforfeiture benefit. The offer of a nonforfeiture benefit may be in the form of a rider that is attached to the policy.

(2) When a group long-term care insurance policy is issued, the offer required in subsection (1) of this section shall be made to the group policyholder. However, if the policy is issued as group long-term care insurance, other than to a continuing care retirement community or other similar entity, the offering shall be made to each proposed certificate holder.

(3) The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations specifying the type or types of nonforfeiture benefits to be offered as part of long-term care insurance policies and certificates and the standards for nonforfeiture benefits.

Laws 1999, LB 323, § 3.